Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.545

Disability leave supplement for law enforcement officers and firefighters—Vested right not created.

Chapter 462, Laws of 1985 neither grants employees a vested right to receive a disability leave supplement nor creates a contractual obligation on behalf of the state or its political subdivisions to provide a disability leave supplement.

[ 1985 c 462 s 13.]

NOTES:

Program and fiscal review—1985 c 462: See note following RCW 41.04.500.